Vermont, session 2025-2026, S204.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Vermont Energy Equity Law.”
Sec. 2. 30 V.S.A. § 209(b) is amended to read:
(b) Required rules.
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 218 of this chapter, the
Public Utility Commission shall, under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, adopt rules
applicable to companies subject to this chapter that:
VT LEG #385794 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.204
2026 Page 2 of 6
(1)(A) regulate or prescribe terms and conditions of extension of
utility service to customers or applicants for service including:
(A)(i) the conditions under which a deposit may be required, if
any;
(B)(ii) the extension of service lines;
(C)(iii) the terms of payment of any required deposit; and
(D)(iv) the return of any deposit;
(2)(B) regulate or prescribe the grounds upon which the companies
may disconnect or refuse to reconnect service to customers; and
(3)(C) regulate and prescribe reasonable procedures used by
companies in disconnecting or reconnecting services and billing customers.
(2) The Public Utility Commission shall amend Rule 3.300, concerning
disconnection of residential gas, electric, and water service, to specify that:
(A) a physician’s certificate certifying that a ratepayer or resident
within the ratepayer’s household would suffer an immediate and serious health
hazard by the disconnection of gas, electric, or water service, or by failure to
reconnect such service, shall prevent disconnection or require reconnection, as
applicable, and shall remain in effect for the time period specified in the
certification unless the Commission rules otherwise; and
VT LEG #385794 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.204
2026 Page 3 of 6
(B) no gas, electric, or water utility may disconnect service to any
residential ratepayer during periods of extreme heat, as defined by the
Commission.
Sec. 3. 30 V.S.A. § 209c is amended to read:
§ 209c. ELECTRICITY AFFORDABILITY ELECTRIC
RATEPAYER PROTECTION PROGRAM
(a) The Public Utility Commission shall design a proposed electricity
affordability statewide electric ratepayer protection program in the form of
draft legislation for low- and moderate-income households. The program shall
be developed with the aid of an electricity affordability electric ratepayer
protection program collaborative. The collaborative, composed of
representatives from the electric utilities, residential customers, consumer
representatives, low-income low- and moderate-income program
representatives, representatives from programs for elders, the Department of
Public Service, the Agency of Human Services, and other stakeholders
identified by the Commission, shall aid in the development of an electricity
affordability the program, as well as including requirements for the
implementation and funding of the program. The proposed electricity
affordability program will be presented to the Vermont General Assembly in
the form of draft legislation for consideration in January 2007 On or before
January 15, 2027, the Commission shall submit the program developed
VT LEG #385794 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.204
2026 Page 4 of 6
pursuant to this section in the form of draft legislation to the House Committee
on Energy and Digital Infrastructure and the Senate Committee on Finance.
(b) The proposed electricity affordability electric ratepayer protection
program shall provide financial assistance in the payment of electricity bills for
eligible low-income low- and moderate-income residential customers served
by electric companies subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission.
(c) In developing the electricity affordability program, the Commission
shall review the successes and administrative burdens of similar programs in
operation in other states and consider the following goals, which shall be
afforded equal weight in formulating the program The electric ratepayer
protection program may include:
(1) the need to provide payment assistance to low-income eligibility for
customers at and below 150 300 percent of the federal poverty level;
(2) the need for where feasible, automatic screening and enrollment
methods of eligible customers by means of information obtained from existing
means-tested financial assistance programs administered by other Vermont
agencies, such as food stamps Lifeline, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program, Medicaid, LIHEAP, or TANF Reach Up; and
(3) the need to design a program that is funded by all customer classes
in an equitable and reasonable manner and that results in the reimbursement of
net incremental costs incurred by electric utilities to implement the program,
VT LEG #385794 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.204
2026 Page 5 of 6
taking into consideration the benefits as well as the costs funding through
customer charges applicable to all ratepayer classes in an equitable and
reasonable manner, including fixed or volumetric charges;
(4) a statewide funding mechanism that applies to all or most customers
in the State and that reallocates the funds collected to all utility service
territories based on need;
(5) a tiered discount program, a percentage-of-income program, or any
other similar program;
(6) a cap on kilowatt-hours subject to the discount;
(7) exemptions from program charges where appropriate, such as for
households earning up to 80 percent of the State median income;
(8) a cap on the amount of a volumetric charge that any one customer is
required to pay under the program;
(9) the adoption of performance metrics that result in a reduced return
on equity for any investor-owned utility that fails to reduce its disconnection
notices and disconnections upon program implementation;
(10) arrearage forgiveness;
(11) administration on a statewide basis by a State agency or an entity
supervised by the Commission;
(12) funding that results in the reimbursement of net incremental
program implementation costs incurred by a utility;
VT LEG #385794 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.204
2026 Page 6 of 6
(13) mechanisms that ensure that any cost savings realized by a utility
through reduced debt and collection expenses commensurately benefit
customers through reduced rates; and
(14) as deemed appropriate by the Commission, any other program
requirements that ensure that Vermont’s most vulnerable households are not
burdened with unaffordable energy costs as the State transitions to a just and
equitable clean energy economy.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385794 v.1